Idaho statutes. Title 15 UNIFORM PROBATE CODE
Part 5
Powers of Attorney

§ 15-5-501. Definition. [Repealed.]

§ 15-5-502. Durable power of attorney not affected by disability. [Repealed.]

§ 15-5-503. Relation of attorney in fact to court-appointed fiduciary. [Repealed.]

§ 15-5-504. Power of attorney not revoked until notice. [Repealed.]

§ 15-5-505. Proof of continuance of durable and other powers of attorney by affidavit. [Repealed.]

§ 15-5-506. Uniformity of application and construction. [Repealed.]

§ 15-5-507. Short title. [Repealed.]

§ 15-5-508. Restrictions on transfers in trust. [Amended and Redesignated.]